Hawaii statutes.
§287-30 Excess coverage permitted. Any
policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy
may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage
specified for a motor vehicle liability policy and the excess or additional
coverage shall not be subject to this chapter. With respect to a policy which
grants such excess or additional coverage the term "motor vehicle
liability policy" shall apply only to that part of the coverage which is
required by this chapter. [L 1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-108; HRS
§287-30]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next